South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3729.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 21, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-21-107.     (A) For the purposes of this section: (1)   "Acceptable electronic format" means an electronic image produced on a person's cellular phone or other portable electronic device that displays all of the information in a policy declaration or other documentation as clearly as a paper policy declaration or other documentation. (2)   "Proof of insurance" shall consist of a policy declaration page or other documentation, or a copy of a policy declaration page or other documentation, available in an acceptable electronic format that can be carried on a watercraft, that reflects the watercraft coverage furnished to an insured by an insurance company. The presentment of proof of insurance in an acceptable electronic format does not: (a)   authorize a search of any other content of an electronic device without a search warrant or probable cause; or (b)   expand or restrict the authority of a law enforcement officer to conduct a search or investigation. (B)  It shall be unlawful for the owner of a watercraft of at least sixteen feet in length that is titled in this State or is documented by the United States Coast Guard with a hailing port located in this State to allow the operation of the watercraft on the waters of this State unless it is covered by a liability insurance policy that has been issued by an insurance company. The insurance policy must provide at least fifty thousand dollars of combined liability coverage for bodily injury to others, or the destruction of the property of others, resulting from any one occurrence. (C)  Each applicant for a watercraft title and registration, and each applicant for a registration renewal, of a watercraft of at least sixteen feet in length shall certify to the department that the watercraft is covered by an insurance policy that meets the requirements of this section. (D)  Insurance companies shall not be required to provide proof of insurance that may be conveniently carried if the insurance coverage is provided as part of a homeowner's insurance policy. Insurance companies are not required to notify the department of any lapse or cancelation in insurance coverage. (E)(1)  If a watercraft of at least sixteen feet in length is involved in an accident on the waters of this State, then failure to present proof of insurance coverage that meets the requirements of this section creates a rebuttable presumption that the watercraft is uninsured. (2)   Upon a showing that liability coverage required by this section was in effect at the time of an accident, a judge may dismiss a charge imposed under this section, and the penalties may not be imposed. However, if the operator of a watercraft of at least sixteen feet in length is involved in an accident on the waters of this State and the watercraft is not insured as required by this section, then the owner of the watercraft, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. (F)   A person who violates the provisions of this section: (1)   for a first offense, must be fined not less than fifty dollars and not more than two hundred fifty dollars; (2)   for a second offense, must be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars and not more than five hundred dollars; and (3)   for a third or subsequent offense, must be fined not less than five hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars, imprisoned for up to one year, or both. (G)  All fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the general fund and credited to the department for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and operating a program for boater training and boater safety throughout the State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----